Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1193XS (4) 91 as/js S.F. 62 Section 1. Section 80.25, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 80.25 Railway special agents. 3 1. The commissioner of public safety may appoint as 4 special agent any person who is regularly employed by a common 5 carrier by rail railroad corporation to protect the property 6 of said common carrier railroad corporation , its patrons, 7 and employees. Such special agents shall not receive any 8 compensation from the state. 9 2. A railway special agent shall cooperate with city, 10 county, and state law enforcement when investigating a criminal 11 offense or crash involving a resident of or property located 12 within the state. 13 3. For purposes of this section, ârailroad corporationâ 14 means the same as defined in section 327D.2. 15